Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2601
Commission; members; qualifications; appointment; terms.

(1) There is hereby established the Commission on African American Affairs. For purposes of sections 81-2601 to 81-2607, commission means the Commission on African American Affairs.

(2) The commission shall consist of fourteen members who shall be of African ancestry. Members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor. One member of the commission shall, at the time of initial appointment, be an individual who identifies as an immigrant or new American, and one member shall, at the time of initial appointment, be a young professional eighteen years of age or older and younger than twenty-five years of age. The commission shall elect one of its members as chairperson.

(3) Members of the commission shall serve no more than two full, four-year terms. An appointment for an unexpired term shall follow the same procedure as for initial and subsequent appointments.

(4) The names of all commissioners shall be listed on the commission's website.

Laws 2020, LB918, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB69, § 1.